North Dakota statutes. TITLE 14 Domestic Relations and Persons
CHAPTER 14-20 Uniform Parentage Act
14-20-43. (608)
Authority to deny motion for genetic testing.

In a proceeding to adjudicate the parentage of a child having a presumed father or to challenge the paternity of a child having an acknowledged father, the court may deny a motion seeking an order for genetic testing of the mother, the child, and the presumed or acknowledged father if the court determines that:

The conduct of the mother or the presumed or acknowledged father estops that party from denying parentage; and

It would be inequitable to disprove the father-child relationship between the child and the presumed or acknowledged father.

In determining whether to deny a motion seeking an order for genetic testing under this section, the court shall consider the best interest of the child, including the following factors:

The length of time between the proceeding to adjudicate parentage and the time that the presumed or acknowledged father was placed on notice that he might not be the genetic father;

The length of time during which the presumed or acknowledged father has assumed the role of father of the child;

The facts surrounding the presumed or acknowledged father’s discovery of his possible nonpaternity;

The nature of the relationship between the child and the presumed or acknowledged father;

The age of the child;

The harm that may result to the child if presumed or acknowledged paternity is successfully disproved;

The nature of the relationship between the child and any alleged father;

The extent to which the passage of time reduces the chances of establishing the paternity of another man and a child support obligation in favor of the child; and

Other factors that may affect the qualities arising from the disruption of the father-child relationship between the child and the presumed or acknowledged father or the chance of other harm to the child.

In a proceeding involving the application of this section, a minor or incapacitated child must be represented by a guardian ad litem.

Denial of a motion seeking an order for genetic testing must be based on clear and convincing evidence.

If the court denies a motion seeking an order for genetic testing, it shall issue an order adjudicating the presumed or acknowledged father to be the father of the child.

Source:

S.L. 2005, ch. 135, § 9.

14-20-44. (609)
Limitation — Child having acknowledged or adjudicated father.

If a child has an acknowledged father, a signatory to the acknowledgment of paternity or denial of paternity may commence a proceeding seeking to rescind the acknowledgment or denial or challenge the paternity of the child only within the time allowed under section 14-20-17 or 14-20-18.

If a child has an acknowledged father or an adjudicated father, an individual, other than the child, who is neither a signatory to the acknowledgment of a paternity nor a party to the adjudication and who seeks an adjudication of paternity of the child must commence a proceeding not later than two years after the effective date of the acknowledgment or adjudication.

A proceeding under this section is subject to the application of the principles of estoppel established in section 14-20-43.

Source:

S.L. 2005, ch. 135, § 9.

14-20-45. (610)
Joinder of proceedings.

Except as otherwise provided in subsection 2, a proceeding to adjudicate parentage may be joined with a proceeding for adoption, termination of parental rights, child custody or visitation, child support, divorce, annulment, legal separation or separate maintenance, probate or administration of an estate, or other appropriate proceeding.

A respondent may not join a proceeding described in subsection 1 with a proceeding to adjudicate parentage brought under chapter 14-12.2.

Source:

S.L. 2005, ch. 135, § 9.

14-20-46. (611)
Proceeding before birth.

A proceeding to determine parentage may be commenced before the birth of the child, but may not be concluded until after the birth of the child. The following actions may be taken before the birth of the child:

Service of process;

Discovery; and

Except as prohibited by section 14-20-26, collection of specimens for genetic testing.

Source:

S.L. 2005, ch. 135, § 9.

14-20-47. (612)
Child as party — Representation.

A minor child is a permissible party, but is not a necessary party to a proceeding under sections 14-20-36 through 14-20-58.

The court shall appoint a guardian ad litem to represent a minor or incapacitated child if the child is a party or the court finds that the interests of the child are not adequately represented.

Source:

S.L. 2005, ch. 135, § 9.

14-20-48. (621)
Admissibility of results of genetic testing — Expenses.

Except as otherwise provided in subsection 3, a record of a genetic-testing expert is admissible as evidence of the truth of the facts asserted in the report unless a party objects to its admission within fourteen days after its receipt by the objecting party and cites specific grounds for exclusion. The admissibility of the report is not affected by whether the testing was performed:

Voluntarily or pursuant to an order of the court or a support enforcement agency; or

Before or after the commencement of the proceeding.

A party objecting to the results of genetic testing may call one or more genetic-testing experts to testify in person or by telephone, videoconference, deposition, or another method approved by the court. Unless otherwise ordered by the court, the party offering the testimony bears the expense for the expert testifying.

If a child has a presumed, acknowledged, or adjudicated father, the results of genetic testing are inadmissible to adjudicate parentage unless performed:

With the consent of both the mother and the presumed, acknowledged, or adjudicated father; or

Pursuant to an order of the court under section 14-20-26.

Copies of bills for genetic testing and for prenatal and postnatal health care for the mother and child which are furnished to the adverse party not less than ten days before the date of a hearing are admissible to establish:

The amount of the charges billed; and

That the charges were reasonable, necessary, and customary.

Source:

S.L. 2005, ch. 135, § 9.

14-20-49. (622)
Consequences of declining genetic testing.

An order for genetic testing is enforceable by contempt.

If an individual whose paternity is being determined declines to submit to genetic testing ordered by the court, the court for that reason may adjudicate parentage contrary to the position of that individual.

Genetic testing of the mother of a child is not a condition precedent to testing the child and a man whose paternity is being determined. If the mother is unavailable or declines to submit to genetic testing, the court may order the testing of the child and every man whose paternity is being adjudicated.

Source:

S.L. 2005, ch. 135, § 9.

14-20-50. (623)
Admission of paternity authorized.

A respondent in a proceeding to adjudicate parentage may admit to the paternity of a child by filing a pleading to that effect or by admitting paternity under penalty of perjury when making an appearance or during a hearing.

If the court finds that the admission of paternity satisfies the requirements of this section and finds that there is no reason to question the admission, the court shall issue an order adjudicating the child to be the child of the man admitting paternity.

Source:

S.L. 2005, ch. 135, § 9.

14-20-51. (624)
Temporary order.

In a proceeding under sections 14-20-36 through 14-20-58, the court shall issue a temporary order for support of a child if the order is appropriate and the individual ordered to pay support is:

A presumed father of the child;

Petitioning to have his paternity adjudicated;

Identified as the father through genetic testing under section 14-20-29;

An alleged father who has declined to submit to genetic testing;

Shown by clear and convincing evidence to be the father of the child; or

The mother of the child.

A temporary order may include provisions for custody and visitation as provided by other law of this state.

Source:

S.L. 2005, ch. 135, § 9.

14-20-52. (631)
Rules for adjudication of paternity.

The court shall apply the following rules to adjudicate the paternity of a child:

The paternity of a child having a presumed, acknowledged, or adjudicated father may be disproved only by admissible results of genetic testing excluding that man as the father of the child or identifying another man as the father of the child.

Unless the results of genetic testing are admitted to rebut other results of genetic testing, a man identified as the father of a child under section 14-20-29 must be adjudicated the father of the child.

If the court finds that genetic testing under section 14-20-29 neither identifies nor excludes a man as the father of a child, the court may not dismiss the proceeding. In that event, the results of genetic testing, and other evidence, are admissible to adjudicate the issue of paternity.

Unless the results of genetic testing are admitted to rebut other results of genetic testing, a man excluded as the father of a child by genetic testing must be adjudicated not to be the father of the child.

Source:

S.L. 2005, ch. 135, § 9.

14-20-53. (632)
Jury prohibited.

The court, without a jury, shall adjudicate paternity of a child.

Source:

S.L. 2005, ch. 135, § 9.

14-20-54. (633)
Hearings — Inspection of records.

On request of a party and for good cause shown, the court may close a proceeding under sections 14-20-36 through 14-20-58.

A final order in a proceeding under sections 14-20-36 through 14-20-58 is available for public inspection. Other papers and records are available only with the consent of the parties or on order of the court for good cause.

Source:

S.L. 2005, ch. 135, § 9.

14-20-55. (634)
Order on default.

The court shall issue an order adjudicating the paternity of a man who:

After service of process, is in default; and

Is found by the court to be the father of a child.

Source:

S.L. 2005, ch. 135, § 9.

14-20-56. (635)
Dismissal for want of prosecution.

The court may issue an order dismissing a proceeding commenced under this chapter for want of prosecution only without prejudice. An order of dismissal for want of prosecution purportedly with prejudice is void and has only the effect of a dismissal without prejudice.

Source:

S.L. 2005, ch. 135, § 9.

14-20-57. (636)
Order adjudicating parentage. [Effective through August 31, 2022]

The court shall issue an order adjudicating whether a man alleged or claiming to be the father is the parent of the child.

An order adjudicating parentage must identify the child by name and date of birth.

The order must include the social security numbers of the child and the individuals determined to be the child’s parents.

The order may contain any other provision in the best interest of the child, including payment of support, payment of expenses of the mother’s pregnancy and confinement, custody of the child, visitation with the child, and furnishing of bond or other security for payment of support. A support order must be for a monthly payment in an amount consistent with the guidelines established under section 14-09-09.7 and must be subject to section 14-09-08.1. All remedies for the enforcement of support, custody, and visitation orders apply. The court has continuing jurisdiction to modify an order for future support and, subject to section 14-09-09.6, custody of and visitation with the child.

Except as otherwise provided in subsection 6, the court may assess filing fees, reasonable attorney’s fees, fees for genetic testing, other costs, and necessary travel and other reasonable expenses incurred in a proceeding under sections 14-20-36 through 14-20-58. The court may award attorney’s fees, which may be paid directly to the attorney, who may enforce the order in the attorney’s own name.

The court may not assess fees, costs, or expenses against the support enforcement agency of this state or another state, except as provided by other law.

On request of a party and for good cause shown, the court may order that the name of the child be changed.

If the order of the court is at variance with the child’s birth certificate, the court shall order the state department of health to issue an amended birth registration.

An order adjudicating parentage must be filed with the state department of health.

Source:

S.L. 2005, ch. 135, § 9.

Collateral References.

Entitlement to Attorney’s Fees Under Uniform Parentage Act of 1973. 72 A.L.R.6th 413.

14-20-57. (636)
Order adjudicating parentage. [Effective September 1, 2022]

The court shall issue an order adjudicating whether a man alleged or claiming to be the father is the parent of the child.

An order adjudicating parentage must identify the child by name and date of birth.

The order must include the social security numbers of the child and the individuals determined to be the child’s parents.

The order may contain any other provision in the best interest of the child, including payment of support, payment of expenses of the mother’s pregnancy and confinement, custody of the child, visitation with the child, and furnishing of bond or other security for payment of support. A support order must be for a monthly payment in an amount consistent with the guidelines established under section 14-09-09.7 and must be subject to section 14-09-08.1. All remedies for the enforcement of support, custody, and visitation orders apply. The court has continuing jurisdiction to modify an order for future support and, subject to section 14-09-09.6, custody of and visitation with the child.

Except as otherwise provided in subsection 6, the court may assess filing fees, reasonable attorney’s fees, fees for genetic testing, other costs, and necessary travel and other reasonable expenses incurred in a proceeding under sections 14-20-36 through 14-20-58. The court may award attorney’s fees, which may be paid directly to the attorney, who may enforce the order in the attorney’s own name.

The court may not assess fees, costs, or expenses against the support enforcement agency of this state or another state, except as provided by other law.

On request of a party and for good cause shown, the court may order that the name of the child be changed.

If the order of the court is at variance with the child’s birth certificate, the court shall order the department of health and human services to issue an amended birth registration.

An order adjudicating parentage must be filed with the department of health and human services.

Source:

S.L. 2005, ch. 135, § 9; 2021, ch. 352, § 65, effective September 1, 2022.

14-20-58. (637)
Binding effect of determination of parentage.

Except as otherwise provided in subsection 2, a determination of parentage is binding on:

All signatories to an acknowledgment or denial of paternity as provided in sections 14-20-11 through 14-20-24; and

All parties to an adjudication by a court acting under circumstances that satisfy the jurisdictional requirements of section 14-12.2-04.

A child is not bound by a determination of parentage under this chapter unless:

The determination was based on an unrestricted acknowledgment of paternity and the acknowledgment is consistent with the results of genetic testing;

The adjudication of parentage was based on a finding consistent with the results of genetic testing and the consistency is declared in the determination or is otherwise shown; or

The child was a party or was represented in the proceeding determining parentage by a guardian ad litem.

In a proceeding to dissolve a marriage, the court is deemed to have made an adjudication of the parentage of a child if the court acts under circumstances that satisfy the jurisdictional requirements of section 14-12.2-04, and the final order:

Expressly identifies a child as a “child of the marriage”, “issue of the marriage”, or similar words indicating that the husband is the father of the child; or

Provides for support of the child, custody of the child, or visitation with the child by the husband unless paternity is specifically disclaimed in the order.

Except as otherwise provided in subsection 2, a determination of parentage may be a defense in a subsequent proceeding seeking to adjudicate parentage by an individual who was not a party to the earlier proceeding.

A party to an adjudication of paternity may challenge the adjudication only under law of this state relating to appeal, vacation of judgments, or other judicial review.

Source:

S.L. 2005, ch. 135, § 9.

14-20-58.1.
Liability for collection of support.

As used in this section, “former parent” means an acknowledged father who successfully rescinded or challenged an acknowledgment of paternity under this chapter, a presumed father whose parentage was successfully rebutted under this chapter, or an adjudicated father whose parentage was disestablished after an order issued under this chapter was vacated.

The state is not liable for child support that was collected from or on behalf of a former parent and disbursed to an obligee as defined in section 14-09-09.10.

The state is not liable for child support that was collected from or on behalf of a former parent and retained by the state unless ordered by a court after being presented with genetic test results that would otherwise be admissible under this chapter showing that the former parent is not the genetic parent of the child.

Source:

S.L. 2005, ch. 135, § 9.

14-20-59. (701)
Scope.

Sections 14-20-59 through 14-20-65 do not apply to the birth of a child conceived by means of sexual intercourse.

Source:

S.L. 2005, ch. 135, § 9.

14-20-60. (702)
Parental status of donor.

A donor is not a parent of a child conceived by means of assisted reproduction.

Source:

S.L. 2005, ch. 135, § 9.

14-20-61. (703)
Paternity of child of assisted reproduction.

A man who provides sperm for, or consents to, assisted reproduction by a woman as provided in section 14-20-62 with the intent to be the parent of her child, is a parent of the resulting child. Parentage of a child born to a gestational carrier is governed by chapter 14-18.

Source:

S.L. 2005, ch. 135, § 9.

14-20-62. (704)
Consent to assisted reproduction.

Consent by a woman, and a man who intends to be a parent of a child born to the woman by assisted reproduction, must be in a record signed by the woman and the man. This requirement does not apply to a donor.

Failure by a man to sign a consent required by subsection 1, before or after birth of the child, does not preclude a finding of paternity if the woman and the man, during the first two years of the child’s life, resided together in the same household with the child and openly held out the child as their own.

Source:

S.L. 2005, ch. 135, § 9.

14-20-63. (705)
Limitation on husband’s dispute of paternity.

Except as otherwise provided in subsection 2, the husband of a wife who gives birth to a child by means of assisted reproduction may not challenge his paternity of the child unless:

Within two years after learning of the birth of the child he commences a proceeding to adjudicate his paternity; and

The court finds that he did not consent to the assisted reproduction, before or after birth of the child.

A proceeding to adjudicate paternity may be maintained at any time if the court determines that:

The husband did not provide sperm for, or before or after the birth of the child consent to, assisted reproduction by his wife;

The husband and the mother of the child have not cohabited since the probable time of assisted reproduction; and

The husband never openly held out the child as his own.

The limitation provided in this section applies to a marriage declared invalid after assisted reproduction.

Source:

S.L. 2005, ch. 135, § 9.

14-20-64. (706)
Effect of dissolution of marriage or withdrawal of consent.

If a marriage is dissolved before placement of eggs, sperm, or embryos, the former spouse is not a parent of the resulting child unless the former spouse consented in a record that if assisted reproduction were to occur after a divorce, the former spouse would be a parent of the child.

The consent of a woman or a man to assisted reproduction may be withdrawn by that individual in a record at any time before placement of eggs, sperm, or embryos. An individual who withdraws consent under this section is not a parent of the resulting child.

Source:

S.L. 2005, ch. 135, § 9.

14-20-65. (707)
Parental status of deceased individual.

If an individual who consented in a record to be a parent by assisted reproduction dies before placement of eggs, sperm, or embryos, the deceased individual is not a parent of the resulting child unless the deceased spouse consented in a record that if assisted reproduction were to occur after death, the deceased individual would be a parent of the child.

Source:

S.L. 2005, ch. 135, § 9.

14-20-66. (901)
Uniformity of application and construction.

In applying and construing this chapter, consideration must be given to the need to promote uniformity of the law with respect to its subject matter among states that enact it.

Source:

S.L. 2005, ch. 135, § 9.